Utah statutes.
53A-18-103.   Consolidated school district bonds.
(1)  A consolidated county school district may issue bonds, without an
election, to fund, purchase, or redeem the district's outstanding indebtedness
if the debt was incurred prior to consolidation and assumed by the
consolidated school district.
(2)  The legality, regularity, and validity of the outstanding indebtedness
shall be determined in the same manner used to determine the validity of other
bonds to be refunded by the board.
